Illinois, session 104th, SB3806.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 514C-3 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14C-3)  (from Ch. 122, par. 14C-3)7    Sec. 14C-3. Language classification of children; 8establishment of program; period of participation; 9examination. Each school district shall ascertain, not later 10than the first day of March, under regulations prescribed by 11the State Board, the number of English learners within the 12school district, and shall classify them according to the 13language of which they possess a primary speaking ability, and 14their grade level, age or achievement level.15    When, at the beginning of any school year, there is within 16an attendance center of a school district, not including 17children who are enrolled in existing private school systems, 1820 or more English learners in any such language 19classification, the school district shall establish, for each 20classification, a program in transitional bilingual education 21for the children therein. A school district may establish a 22program in transitional bilingual education with respect to 23any classification with less than 20 children therein, but   SB3806- 2 -LRB104 19327 LNS 32773 b1should a school district decide not to establish such a 2program, the school district shall provide a locally 3determined transitional program of instruction which, based 4upon an individual student language assessment, provides 5content area instruction in a language other than English to 6the extent necessary to ensure that each student can benefit 7from educational instruction and achieve an early and 8effective transition into the regular school curriculum.9    Every school-age English learner not enrolled in existing 10private school systems shall be enrolled and participate in 11the program in transitional bilingual education established 12for the classification to which he belongs by the school 13district in which he resides until such time as he achieves a 14level of English language skills which will enable him to 15perform successfully in classes in which instruction is given 16only in English.17    An examination in the oral language (listening and 18speaking), reading, and writing of English, as prescribed by 19the State Board, shall be administered annually to all English 20learners enrolled and participating in a program in 21transitional bilingual education. No school district shall 22transfer an English learner out of a program in transitional 23bilingual education unless the child has received a score on 24said examination which, in the determination of the State 25Board, reflects a level of English language skills appropriate 26to his or her grade level.  SB3806- 3 -LRB104 19327 LNS 32773 b1    Subject to appropriation, the State Board shall establish 2and implement an English Learner Grant Program to support 3school districts' English learner programs. 4(Source: P.A. 104-261, eff. 1-1-26.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.